Utah statutes.
11-2-6.   Cooperation between school districts and cities, towns and counties.

Any board of education of any school district may join with any city, town or county in purchasing, equipping, operating and maintaining playgrounds, athletic fields, gymnasiums, baths, swimming pools, television transmission and relay facilities of the type referred to in Section 11-2-2 and other recreational facilities and activities, and may appropriate money therefor.



Amended by Chapter 22, 1957 General Session

